rules/rm_sursilv.aff
FLAG long
# Past participle of irregular transitive verbs
# - buiu --> buiu/buius, buida, bui, buidas
# - mess --> mess, messa, mess, messas
# - piars --> piars, piarsa, piars, piarsas
# - fatg --> fatg/fatgs, fatga, fatgs, fatgas
SFX Tx N 15
SFX Tx u u .     po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx u us .    po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx u da .    po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx iu i .    po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx u i [^i]  po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx u das .   po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx s s .     po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx s sa .    po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx s s .     po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx s sas .   po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx tg tg .   po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx tg tgs .  po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx tg tga .  po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx tg tgs .  po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Tx tg tgas . po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part

# Past participle of transitive verbs
# - debostgar --> debostgau, debostgada, debostgai, debostgadas
# - valer --> valiu/valius, valida, vali, validas
# - vender --> vendiu/vendius, vendida, vendi, vendidas
# - capir --> capiu/capius, capida, capi, capidas
SFX Ty N 14
SFX Ty ar au .   po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty ar ada .  po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty ar ai .   po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty ar adas . po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty er iu .   po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty er ius .  po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty er ida .  po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty er i .    po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty er idas . po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty ir iu .   po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty ir ius .  po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty ir ida .  po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty ir i .    po:VERB uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part
SFX Ty ir idas . po:VERB uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Part

# Verb forms of transitive verbs that are shared among all conjugation classes
# - Ind Past: admirar --> admiravel, admiravas, admirava,
#                         admiravan, admiravas, admiravan
# - Sub Past: admirar --> admiravi, admiravies, admiravi,
#                         admiravien, admiravies, admiravien
# - Ind Past: vender --> vendevel, vendevas, vendeva,
#                        vendevan, vendevas, vendevan
# - Ind Past: capir --> capevel, capevas, capeva,
#                       capevan, capevas, capevan
# - Cnd Pres: debostgar --> debostgass/debostgassel, debostgasses, debostgass,
#                           debostgassen, debostgasses, debostgassen
# - Cnd Past: debostgar --> debostgassi, debostgassies, debostgassi,
#                           debostgassien, debostgassies, debostgassien
SFX Tz N 49
SFX Tz ar avel .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avas .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar ava .   po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avan .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avas .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avan .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avi .   po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avies . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avi .   po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avien . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avies . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar avien . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evel . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evas . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er eva . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evan . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evas . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evan . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evi .   po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evies . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evi .   po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evien . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evies . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz er evien . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evel . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evas . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir eva . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evan . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evas . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evan . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evi .   po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evies . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evi .   po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evien . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evies . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ir evien . po:VERB uf:Mood=Sub|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar ass .    po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar assel .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar asses .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar ass .    po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar assen .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar asses .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar assen .  po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar assi .   po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar assies . po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar assi .   po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar assien . po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar assies . po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tz ar assien . po:VERB uf:Mood=Cnd|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Past|VerbForm=Fin

# Adjectives: abstract
# abstract, abstracta, abstracts, abstractas
SFX Ad N 4
SFX Ad 0 0 . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing
SFX Ad 0 a . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing
SFX Ad 0 s . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur
SFX Ad 0 as . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur

# Invariable adjectives: extra
# extra, extra, extra, extra (all forms are identical)
SFX Ai N 4
SFX Ai 0 0 . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing
SFX Ai 0 0 . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing
SFX Ai 0 0 . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur
SFX Ai 0 0 . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur

# Ordinal adjectives: tschienavel
# tschienavel, tschienavla, tschienavels, tschienavlas
SFX Ao N 6
SFX Ao 0 0 . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Masc|NumType=Ord|Number=Sing
SFX Ao 0 a [^l] po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|NumType=Ord|Number=Sing
SFX Ao el la . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|NumType=Ord|Number=Sing
SFX Ao 0 s . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Masc|NumType=Ord|Number=Plur
SFX Ao 0 as . [^l] po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|NumType=Ord|Number=Plur
SFX Ao el las . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|NumType=Ord|Number=Plur

# Adverbs: biaronz
SFX Av N 1
SFX Av 0 0 . po:ADV

# Feminine nouns, singular: staila
SFX Fs N 1
SFX Fs    0 0 . po:NOUN uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing

# Feminine nouns, plural: staila --> stailas; bleis --> bleis
SFX Fp N 2
SFX Fp    0 s [^s] po:NOUN uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur
SFX Fp    s s .    po:NOUN uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur

# Feminine nouns, plural only: repressalias
SFX FP N 1
SFX FP 0 0 . po:NOUN uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur

# Masculine nouns, singular: caschiel
SFX Ms N 1
SFX Ms    0 0 . po:NOUN uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing

# Masculine nouns, plural: caschiel --> caschiels; uors --> uors
SFX Mp N 2
SFX Mp    0 s [^s] po:NOUN uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur
SFX Mp    s s .    po:NOUN uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur

# Masculine nouns, plural only: capuns
SFX MP N 1
SFX MP 0 0 . po:NOUN uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur

# Adpositions/prepositions: ADP
SFX Ap N 1
SFX Ap 0 0 . po:ADP

# Conjuctions: CONJ
SFX Cj N 1
SFX Cj 0 0 . po:CONJ

# Cardinal number: otg
SFX Cn N 1
SFX Cn 0 0 . po:NUM uf:NumType=Card

# Interjections: assa
SFX Ij N 1
SFX Ij 0 0 . po:INTJ

# Demonstrative pronoun: quest
# quest, questa, quests, questas
SFX Pd N 4
SFX Pd 0 0 . po:PRON uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing|PronType=Dem
SFX Pd 0 a . po:PRON uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing|PronType=Dem
SFX Pd 0 s . po:PRON uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur|PronType=Dem
SFX Pd 0 as . po:PRON uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur|PronType=Dem

# Interrogative pronoun: tgi
SFX Pi N 1
SFX Pi 0 0 . po:PRON uf:PronType=Int

# Indeterminite pronoun: enqualche
SFX Pj N 1
SFX Pj 0 0 . po:PRON uf:PronType=Ind

# Proper noun, feminine: Catrina
SFX Pf N 1
SFX Pf 0 0 . po:PROPN uf:Gender=Fem

# Proper noun, masculine: Carli
SFX Pm N 1
SFX Pm 0 0 . po:PROPN uf:Gender=Masc

# Proper noun: Decurtins
SFX Pn N 1
SFX Pn 0 0 . po:PROPN

# Adjectives: admirabel
# admirabel, admirabels, admirabla, admirablas
SFX Adc N 4
SFX Adc 0 0 . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Sing
SFX Adc el la . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Sing
SFX Adc 0 s . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur
SFX Adc el las . po:ADJ uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur
